Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.220

Standard court forms—Mandatory use.

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop not later than July 1, 1991, standard court forms and format rules for mandatory use by litigants in all actions commenced under chapters 26.09, *26.10, 26.26A, and 26.26B RCW effective January 1, 1992. The administrator for the courts shall develop mandatory forms for financial affidavits for integration into the worksheets. The forms shall be developed and approved not later than September 1, 1992. The parties shall use the mandatory form for financial affidavits for actions commenced on or after September 1, 1992. The administrative office of the courts has continuing responsibility to develop and revise mandatory forms and format rules as appropriate.

(2) A party may delete unnecessary portions of the forms according to the rules established by the administrative office of the courts. A party may supplement the mandatory forms with additional material.

(3) A party's failure to use the mandatory forms or follow the format rules shall not be a reason to dismiss a case, refuse a filing, or strike a pleading. However, the court may require the party to submit a corrected pleading and may impose terms payable to the opposing party or payable to the court, or both.

(4) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master copy of the forms to all county court clerks. The administrative office of the courts and county clerks shall distribute the mandatory forms to the public upon request and may charge for the cost of production and distribution of the forms. Private vendors may distribute the mandatory forms. Distribution may be in printed or electronic form.

[ 2019 c 46 s 5025; 2005 c 282 s 34; 1992 c 229 s 5; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 25.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 26.10 RCW, with the exception of RCW 26.10.115, was repealed by 2020 c 312 s 905. RCW 26.10.115 was repealed by 2021 c 215 s 170, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.